Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1477
Deceptive or misleading advertising; unlawful acts; enumerated.

For the purpose of section 28-1476 any person, firm, corporation, or association shall be deemed guilty of deceptive or misleading advertising that makes, publishes, disseminates, circulates, or places before the public, or causes, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public in this state, in a newspaper or other publication, or in the form of a book, notice, handbill, poster, bill, circular, pamphlet, or letter, or in any other way, an advertisement of any merchandise for sale at retail at less than original actual cost or less than original replacement cost, whichever is lower, if the merchant does not have a sufficient quantity of merchandise to meet the reasonable expected demand, or the advertisement either (1) fails to state in such advertisement the quantity of merchandise available for sale, or (2) fails to state that the advertiser is discontinuing the item.

Laws 1980, LB 185, § 2.